California, session 20252026, AB1986.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 679.91 is added to the Insurance Code, immediately following Section 679.9, to read:679.91. Upon request for a premium quote for residential property insurance, an insurer of a policy specified in Section 675 shall provide a premium quote for the residential property that includes the price of insurance if the property is certified as “hardened” by a home hardening certification program established or approved by the State Fire Marshal and a premium quote for the residential property in its current state.